Louisiana, session 2026, SB62.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1108.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1108.1. Construction of carbon dioxide pipelines prohibited
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person shall
construct a pipeline for the purpose, in whole or in part, of transporting carbon
dioxide within the boundaries of the following:
(1) Lake Maurepas.
(2) Lake Ponchartrain.